New Jersey, session 221, S4159.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission shall permit a person with an expired standard basic drivers license to renew the persons standard basic drivers license without being required to re-take the written law knowledge examination or the road test if: a. the person produces documentation from a physician with a plenary license to practice medicine and surgery in this State or a bordering State; a physician stationed at a military or naval installation located in this State who is licensed to practice in any state; a physician assistant licensed to practice in this State or a bordering state; or a nurse practitioner licensed to practice in this State or a bordering state, which documentation demonstrates that the person has either a mental or a psychological condition that interferes with the persons ability to renew the persons standard basic drivers license in person at a commission agency location; and b. in the estimation of the Chief Administrator of the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission, the person can safely operate a motor vehicle based upon the persons driving record. 2. This act shall take effect immediately.